Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 2
Maximum Finance Charges

§ 28-42-201. Maximum finance charge.

With respect to a loan or credit sale, the rate of finance charge shall be that which is agreed upon between the parties to the transaction. In addition to the finance charge permitted herein, a creditor may contract for and receive any other charge, except to the extent expressly prohibited or limited by this act.

This section does not limit or restrict the manner of calculating the finance charge, whether by way of add-on, discount, single annual percentage rate, or otherwise. If the credit transaction is precomputed:

The finance charge may be calculated on the assumption that all scheduled payments will be made when due; and

The effect of prepayment is governed by the provisions on rebate upon prepayment, section 28-42-307, Idaho Code.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the term of a credit transaction for purposes of this section commences on the day the credit transaction is made. The administrator may adopt rules with respect to treating as regular minor irregularities in amount or time.

With respect to an insurance premium loan, the term of the loan commences on the earliest inception date of a policy or contract of insurance, payment of the premium on which is financed by the loan.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-42-201, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 1991, ch. 278, § 1, p. 720; am. 1993, ch. 227, § 1, p. 797.